Nevada, session 83, SB6.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Desert Research Institute of the Nevada System
of Higher Education to support the Nevada State Cloud Seeding
Program administered by the Desert Research Institute the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $600,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $600,000
2. The Desert Research Institute shall:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 1, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Desert
Research Institute through June 30, 2026; and
(b) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 1, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Desert
Research Institute through June 30, 2027.
Sec. 2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by section 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any
entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred,
and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)